Wisconsin, session 2025, SB932.
do enact as follows:SB932,13Section 1. 134.44 of the statutes is created to read:SB932,1,44134.44 Legal status of artificial intelligence. (1) In this section:SB932,1,85(a) “Artificial intelligence” means an engineered or machine-based system 6that varies in its level of autonomy and that can, for explicit or implicit objectives, 7infer from the input it receives how to generate outputs that can influence physical 8or virtual environments.SB932,2,21(b) “Developer” means any person primarily responsible for the design, coding, 2and initial creation of artificial intelligence.SB932,2,33(c) “Entity” has the meaning given in s. 180.0103 (8).SB932,2,54(d) “Manufacturer” means any person that produces or supplies artificial 5intelligence or its physical apparatus, if any, for distribution or sale.SB932,2,86(e) “Owner” means any person that creates, controls, deploys, operates, or 7otherwise exercises authority over artificial intelligence, but does not include the 8end user of artificial intelligence.SB932,2,109(2) (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, artificial intelligence is not 10a person for any purpose under the law of this state.SB932,2,1311(b) Artificial intelligence may not be granted the status of person or any form 12of legal personhood and may not be considered to possess consciousness, self-13awareness, sentience, or any similar traits of living beings.SB932,2,1614(c) Artificial intelligence may not be a spouse or domestic partner and may not 15hold any legal status analogous to marriage or union with a human or with other 16artificial intelligence.SB932,2,1817(d) Artificial intelligence may not be designated, be appointed, or serve as an 18officer, director, partner, manager, or member, or any similar role, of an entity.SB932,2,2319(e) Artificial intelligence may not own, control, or hold title to any form of 20property, including real estate, intellectual property, financial accounts, and digital 21assets. All assets and proprietary interests generated, managed, or otherwise 22associated with artificial intelligence shall be attributed to the developer, 23manufacturer, or owner of the artificial intelligence.SB932,3,21(f) Artificial intelligence is not a person against which liability may be 2imposed.SB932,3,33(3) Any action contrary to sub. (2) (c) is void and has no legal effect.SB932,24Section 2. 990.01 (26) of the statutes is amended to read:SB932,3,75990.01 (26) Person. “Person” includes all partnerships, associations and 6bodies politic or corporate. “Person” does not include artificial intelligence, as 7defined in s. 134.44 (1) (a).SB932,3,88